Utah statutes.
59-2-301.1.   Assessment of property subject to a conservation easement -- Assessment of golf course or hunting club.

(1)  In assessing the fair market value of property subject to a conservation easement under Title 57, Chapter 18, Land Conservation Easement Act, a county assessor shall consider factors relating to the property and neighboring property that affect the fair market value of the property being assessed, including:

(a)  value that transfers to neighboring property because of the presence of a conservation easement on the property being assessed;

(b)  practical and legal restrictions on the development potential of the property because of the presence of the conservation easement;

(c)  the absence of neighboring property similarly subject to a conservation easement to provide a basis for comparing values between properties; and

(d)  any other factor that causes the fair market value of the property to be affected because of the presence of a conservation easement.

(2) (a)  In assessing the fair market value of a golf course or hunting club, a county assessor shall consider factors relating to the golf course or hunting club and neighboring property that affect the fair market value of the golf course or hunting club, including:

(i)  value that transfers to neighboring property because of the presence of the golf course or hunting club;

(ii)  practical and legal restrictions on the development potential of the golf course or hunting club; and

(iii)  the history of operation of the golf course or hunting club and the likelihood that the present use will continue into the future.

(b)  The valuation method a county assessor may use in determining the fair market value of a golf course or hunting club includes:

(i)  the cost approach;

(ii)  the income capitalization approach; and

(iii)  the sales comparison approach.



Amended by Chapter 157, 2011 General Session

